Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 08. Emergency Medical Services.

Cross references. —

For duty of emergency medical technicians and paramedics to report certain injuries, see AS

08.64.369

.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency medical services, see 7 AAC 26.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 35 — 38, 58 — 71.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 7 — 27.

Sec. 18.08.010.
Administration.

The department is responsible for the development, implementation, and maintenance of a statewide comprehensive emergency medical services system and, accordingly, shall

coordinate public and private agencies engaged in the planning and delivery of emergency medical services, including trauma care, to plan an emergency medical services system;

assist public and private agencies to deliver emergency medical services, including trauma care, through the award of grants in aid;

conduct, encourage, and approve programs of education and training designed to upgrade the knowledge and skills of health personnel involved in emergency medical services, including trauma care;

establish and maintain a process under which hospitals and clinics could represent themselves to be trauma centers because they voluntarily meet criteria adopted by the department; criteria adopted by the department to implement this paragraph must be based on an applicable national evaluation system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 36 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For emergency medical services outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 2.

For medical directors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 6.

For trauma centers and trauma registry, see 7 AAC 26, art. 7.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Sec. 18.08.015.
Patient information system.

The department may establish an emergency medical services patient care information system. If the department collects information on emergency medical services patient care, the department shall establish a format for the data collection. The purpose of the system is to

collect data on the incidence, severity, and causes of trauma injuries;

integrate this data on trauma injuries with information available from other public and private sources on trauma injuries; and

improve the delivery of prehospital and hospital emergency medical services.

A person, organization, or government agency that provides a prehospital emergency medical service through a certificate issued under this chapter shall participate in the system by making available to the department the minimum data requested in a format that is compatible with the format developed by the department to implement (a) of this section. The minimum data must include the

type of medical emergency or nature of the call;

response time; and

prehospital treatment provided.

A hospital that provides emergency medical services shall make available to the department an abstract of the records of all patients admitted to the hospital’s trauma and general surgery services for trauma care. The abstracts must be in a format that is compatible with the format developed by the department under (a) of this section.

The department shall consult with the Alaska Council on Emergency Medical Services in designing, implementing, and revising the system.

The department may delegate the responsibility for collecting data under this section to other public agencies or to private persons on contract to the department.

In this section, “system” means the emergency medical services patient care information system established under this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 36 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For trauma centers and trauma registry, see 7 AAC 26, art. 7.

Sec. 18.08.020.
Alaska Council on Emergency Medical Services.

There is established in the department the Alaska Council on Emergency Medical Services. The council shall advise the commissioner and the governor with regard to the planning and implementation of a statewide emergency medical services system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 11 ch 36 SLA 1993)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 28(b), ch. 36, SLA 1993 provides that “[f]or all legal purposes, the Alaska Council on Emergency Medical Services established under this Act shall be considered to be a continuation of the Advisory Council on Emergency Medical Services.”

Sec. 18.08.030.
Composition.

The council consists of 11 members appointed by the governor. The governor shall provide for appropriate geographical distribution in the appointments and shall appoint

two members who are physicians with experience in emergency medicine or trauma care;

one member who is a registered nurse with experience in emergency nursing;

three members who are active as prehospital emergency care providers, at least one of whom resides in a community that is not connected by land or marine highway, or a combination of land and marine highway, to a community in which a hospital is located; in this paragraph, “highway” has the meaning given in AS

28.90.990

;

one member who is an emergency medical services administrator;

one member who is an administrator of a hospital or Native health care organization; and

three members who are consumers of emergency medical services who each reside in a different judicial district in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977; am § 12 ch 36 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (3) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Sec. 18.08.040.
Term of office.

Members of the council shall be appointed for staggered terms of four years.

[Repealed, § 27 ch 36 SLA 1993.]

A vacancy occurring in the membership of the council shall be filled by appointment by the governor in the same manner as original appointments, and when a seat is vacated before expiration of a term, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the vacated term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977; am §§ 25, 26 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 27 ch 36 SLA 1993)

Sec. 18.08.050.
Compensation and per diem.

Members of the council receive no salary, but are entitled to per diem, reimbursement for travel, and other expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to per diem, travel and other expenses for members of boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 18.08.060.
Meetings.

The council shall meet at the call of the chairman not less frequently than twice a year. A majority of members constitutes a quorum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977)

Sec. 18.08.070.
Special committees.

The council may create special committees or task forces outside its membership and may appoint persons who are not members of the council to serve as advisors or consultants to any committee created to carry out the purposes of the council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977)

Sec. 18.08.075.
Authority of emergency medical technician and mobile intensive care paramedic.

An emergency medical technician or mobile intensive care paramedic who responds to an emergency with an ambulance service or first responder service, who has in the technician’s or mobile intensive care paramedic’s possession a current emergency medical technician or mobile intensive care paramedic identification card, and who provides emergency medical care or other emergency medical service, has the authority to

control and direct activities at the accident site or emergency until the arrival of law enforcement personnel;

order a person other than the owner to leave a building or place in the vicinity of the accident or other emergency for the purpose of protecting the person from injury;

temporarily block a public highway, street, or private right-of-way while at the scene of an accident, illness, or emergency;

trespass upon property at or near the scene of an accident, illness, or emergency at any time of day or night;

enter a building, including a private dwelling, or premises where a report of an injury or illness has taken place or where there is a reasonable cause to believe an individual has been injured or is ill to render emergency medical care; and

direct the removal or destruction of a motor vehicle or other thing that the emergency medical technician or mobile intensive care paramedic determines is necessary to prevent further harm to injured or ill individuals.

A person who knowingly refuses to comply with an order of an emergency medical technician or mobile intensive care paramedic authorized under (a) of this section is, upon conviction, guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, inserted “or mobile intensive care paramedic”, or similar, following “technician” three times in the introductory language of (a), once in (a)(6), and once in (b).

Sec. 18.08.080.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt, with the concurrence of the Department of Public Safety, regulations establishing standards and procedures for the issuance, renewal, reissuance, revocation, and suspension of certificates or licenses required under AS

18.08.084

, as well as other regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The department may charge fees set by regulation for the certification or licensure of individuals and organizations under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1978; am § 13 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 9 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (a), inserted “or licenses” following “suspension of certificates”; in (b), inserted “or licensure” following “regulation for the certification”.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technician instructors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 1.

For emergency medical services outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 2.

For medevac services, critical care air ambulance services, and specialty aeromedical transport teams outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 3.

For emergency trauma technician instructors and approved emergency trauma technician training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 4.

For manual defibrillator technicians and approved training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 5.

For medical directors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 6.

For trauma centers and trauma registry, see 7 AAC 26, art. 7.

For emergency medical dispatchers, see 7 AAC 26, art. 8.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section gives the department authority to restrict the use of grant funds and grant income of all emergency medical services grants administered by the department, whether or not they are subject to AS

37.05.321

, for the provision and coordination of emergency medical services, and to prohibit the use of grant funds and grant income for “lobbying,” “influencing legislative action,” “legislative monitoring,” or any other purpose not directly related to the provision of those services. Such restrictions must be imposed by regulation. January 15, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.08.082.
Issuance of certificates and licenses; designations.

The department shall prescribe by regulation a course of training or other requirements prerequisite to the issuance of certificates or licenses that provide for the following:

certification of a person who meets the training and other requirements as an emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician instructor, or emergency medical dispatcher;

authorization for an emergency medical technician certified under this chapter to provide under the written or oral direction of a physician the advanced life support services enumerated on the certificate or enumerated on a written document filed with the department by the technician’s medical director and approved by the department under its regulations;

certification that a person, organization, or government agency that provides an emergency medical service, conducts a training course for a mobile intensive care paramedic, or represents itself as a trauma center meets the minimum standards prescribed by the department for that service, course, or designation;

authorization for an emergency medical service certified under this chapter to provide under the written or oral direction of a physician the advanced life support services enumerated on the certificate or enumerated on a written document filed with the department by the medical director for the emergency medical service and approved by the department under its regulations; and

licensure of a mobile intensive care paramedic and the medical services that a mobile intensive care paramedic may perform, including the

educational and other qualifications, which may include education in pain management and opioid use and addiction;

application and licensing procedures;

scope of activities authorized; and

responsibilities of a supervising or training physician.

The department is the central certifying and licensing agency for a person, organization, or governmental agency that is certified or licensed under (a) of this section and under regulations adopted under AS

18.08.080

.

The commissioner shall establish special designations in regulation for varying levels of trauma care provided by any certified trauma center in the state that shall be used to set compensation eligibility and amounts under AS

18.08.085

. The designations shall be based on nationally recognized standards and procedures.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 2010; am §§ 10, 11 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to the validity of a registration of a mobile intensive care paramedic issued before January 1, 2022, the conversion of an unexpired registration to a license under subsections (a) and (b), and the transfer from the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the State Medical Board to the Department of Health and Social Services of all pending records and proceedings relating to mobile intensive care paramedics, see § 19, ch. 29, SLA 2021 in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technician instructors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 1.

For emergency medical services outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 2.

For medevac services, critical care air ambulance services, and specialty aeromedical transport teams outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 3.

For emergency trauma technician instructors and approved emergency trauma technician training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 4.

For manual defibrillator technicians and approved training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 5.

For medical directors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 6.

For trauma centers and trauma registry, see 7 AAC 26, art. 7.

For emergency medical dispatchers, see 7 AAC 26, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 22, 2010, added (c).

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in the introductory language in (a), inserted “or licenses” following “issuance of certificates”, added (a)(5), and made a related change; rewrote (b), which read, “The department is the central certifying agency for personnel certified under (a)(1) and (2) of this section and under regulations adopted under AS 18.08.80.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 28(c),
ch. 36, SLA 1993 provides that notwithstanding the amendments to former
AS

08.64.380

(4) and (b) of this section by ch. 36, “the license of a mobile intensive care paramedic issued by the State Medical Board before August 25, 1993 remains valid even though the licensee has not completed a certified training course as required under those sections.”

Sec. 18.08.084.
Certificate required.

One may not represent oneself, nor may an agency or business represent an agent or employee of that agency or business, as an emergency medical dispatcher, emergency medical technician, mobile intensive care paramedic, or emergency medical technician instructor certified or licensed by the state unless the person represented is certified or licensed for that occupation under AS

18.08.082

.

A person, organization, or government agency may not represent itself as an emergency medical service or ambulance service certified by the state unless the person, organization, or government agency is certified as an emergency medical service under AS

18.08.082

.

A person may not provide, offer, or advertise to provide advanced life support services outside a hospital unless authorized by law.

A person, organization, or government agency that provides, offers, or advertises to provide an emergency medical service may not provide advanced life support services unless authorized under AS

18.08.082

.

A hospital, clinic, or other entity may not represent itself as being a trauma center unless it is certified under AS

18.08.082

as meeting the criteria established for a trauma center.

A person, organization, or government agency may not offer or conduct a training course that is represented as a course for mobile intensive care paramedics unless the person, organization, or agency is certified under AS

18.08.082

to offer or conduct that course.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1978; am §§ 15, 16 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 12 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technician instructors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 1.

For emergency medical services outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 2.

For medevac services, critical care air ambulance services, and specialty aeromedical transport teams outside hospitals, see 7 AAC 26, art. 3.

For emergency trauma technician instructors and approved emergency trauma technician training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 4.

For manual defibrillator technicians and approved training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 5.

For medical directors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 6.

For trauma centers and trauma registry, see 7 AAC 26, art. 7.

For emergency medical dispatchers, see 7 AAC 26, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1. 2022, in (a), inserted “mobile intensive care paramedic,” following “emergency medical technician,” and “or licensed” twice following “certified”.

Sec. 18.08.085.
Trauma care fund; creation.

The trauma care fund is created. The purpose of the fund is to compensate certified trauma centers in the state that receive a special designation under AS

18.08.082(c)

and that achieve or maintain the highest appropriate level of trauma care designation.

The fund consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature, including donations, recoveries of or reimbursements for awards made from the fund, income from the fund, and other program receipts from activities under this chapter. Appropriations to the fund do not lapse.

The commissioner shall administer the fund in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner shall spend money from the trauma care fund for the purpose established in (a) of this section.

The commissioner shall establish compensation standards under this section. The standards must include funding priorities for trauma centers receiving a special designation under AS

18.08.082(c)

. The commissioner may seek the advice of a special committee for review of statewide trauma care and compensation standards.

The commissioner may not provide more than 25 percent of the total assets, including earnings, of the fund in a fiscal year to one trauma center.

History.

(§ 2 ch 98 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.08.086.
Immunity from liability.

A person certified or licensed under AS

18.08.082

who administers emergency medical services to an injured or sick person, a person or public agency that employs, sponsors, directs, or controls the activities of persons certified or licensed under AS

18.08.082

who administer emergency medical services to an injured or sick person, or a health care professional or emergency medical dispatcher acting within the scope of the person’s certification or licensure who directs or advises a person to administer emergency medical services to an injured or sick person is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in administering those services or giving that advice or those directions if the administering, advising, and directing are done in good faith and the injured or sick person reasonably seems to be in immediate danger of serious harm or death. This subsection does not preclude liability for civil damages that are the proximate result of gross negligence or intentional misconduct, nor preclude imposition of liability on a person or public agency that employs, sponsors, directs, or controls the activities of persons certified or licensed under AS 18.08.082 if the act or omission is a proximate result of a breach of duty to act created under this chapter. In this subsection, “gross negligence” means reckless, wilful, or wanton misconduct.

A physician who in good faith arranges for, requests, recommends, or initiates the transfer of a patient from a hospital to another hospital is not liable for civil damages as a result of arranging, requesting, recommending, or initiating the transfer if

in the exercise of that degree of knowledge or skill possessed, or that degree of care ordinarily exercised by physicians practicing the same specialty in the same or similar communities to that in which the physician is practicing, the physician determines that treatment of the patient’s medical condition is beyond the capability of the transferring hospital or the medical community in which the hospital is located;

the physician has confirmed that the receiving facility is more capable of treating the patient; and

the physician has secured a prior agreement from the receiving facility to accept and render the necessary treatment to the patient.

A registered or advanced practice registered nurse or licensed practical nurse who escorts a patient in a means of conveyance not equipped as an ambulance is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in administering patient care services, if done in good faith and if the life of the injured or sick person is in danger. This subsection does not preclude liability for civil damages that are the result of gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

A person certified as an emergency medical technician instructor, a person or entity certified to conduct a training course for mobile intensive care paramedics, and a person who employs or contracts with a certified emergency medical technician instructor or with a person or entity certified to conduct a training course for mobile intensive care paramedics is not liable for civil damages as a result of a negligent act or omission during a training course that injures the person or property of a person participating in the training course.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 1986; am §§ 17, 18 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 29 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 13 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For civil liability for emergency aid, see AS

09.65.090

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (c), inserted “or advanced practice registered nurse” following “registered”.

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (a), inserted “or licensed” following “certified”, or similar, four times, and made a stylistic change.

Collateral references. —

Application of rule of strict liability in tort to person or entity rendering medical services. 100 ALR3d 1205.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by activities of hospital “rescue team”. 64 ALR4th 1200.

Liability of operator of ambulance service for personal injuries to person being transported. 68 ALR4th 14.

Hospital liability as to diagnosis and care of patients in emergency room. 58 ALR5th 613.

Sec. 18.08.087.
Disclosure of medical records.

When requested for the purpose of evaluating the performance of an emergency medical technician, mobile intensive care paramedic, or physician who provided emergency medical care or other assistance to a sick or injured person, a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant may disclose to an emergency medical technician, a mobile intensive care paramedic, or physician the medical or hospital records of a sick or injured person to whom the paramedic, technician, or physician is providing or has rendered emergency medical care or assistance. However, the disclosing physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant shall limit disclosure under this section to the records that are considered necessary by the discloser for evaluation of the paramedic’s, technician’s, or physician’s performance in providing the emergency medical care or assistance. A mobile intensive care paramedic, emergency medical care technician, or physician to whom confidential records are disclosed under this section may not further disclose the information to a person not entitled to receive that information under this section or another law.

History.

(§ 19 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 30 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” in the first sentence and “advanced practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” in the second sentence.

Sec. 18.08.088.
Penalty.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or by both. Each violation is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1978)

Sec. 18.08.089.
Authority to pronounce death.

A mobile intensive care paramedic licensed under this chapter, a physician assistant registered or licensed under AS

08.64.107

, or an emergency medical technician certified under this chapter may make a determination and pronouncement of death of a person under the following circumstances:

the mobile intensive care paramedic or emergency medical technician is an active member of an emergency medical service certified under this chapter;

neither a physician licensed under AS 08.64 nor a physician exempt from licensure under AS 08.64 is immediately available for consultation by radio or telephone communications;

the mobile intensive care paramedic, physician assistant, or emergency medical technician has determined, based on acceptable medical standards, that the person has sustained irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions.

A mobile intensive care paramedic, physician assistant, or emergency medical technician who has determined and pronounced death under this section shall document the clinical criteria for the determination and pronouncement on the person’s emergency medical service report form and notify the appropriate medical director or collaborative physician as soon as communication can be established. The paramedic, physician assistant, or emergency medical technician shall provide to the person who signs the death certificate the

name of the deceased;

presence of a contagious disease, if known; and

date and time of death.

Except as otherwise provided under AS

18.50.230

, a physician licensed under AS 08.64 shall certify a death determined under (b) of this section within 24 hours after the pronouncement by the mobile intensive care paramedic, physician assistant, or emergency medical technician.

In this section,

“acceptable medical standards” means cardiac arrest accompanied by

the presence of injuries incompatible with life, including incineration, decapitation, open head injury with loss of brain matter, or detruncation;

the presence of rigor mortis;

the presence of post mortem lividity; or

failure of the patient to respond to properly administered resuscitation efforts;

“failure of the patient to respond” means without restoration of spontaneous pulse or respiratory effort by the patient;

“properly administered resuscitation efforts” means

when a person authorized to perform advanced cardiac life support techniques is not available and the patient is not hypothermic, at least 30 minutes of properly performed cardiopulmonary resuscitation;

when a person authorized to perform advanced cardiac life support techniques is not available and the patient is hypothermic, at least 60 minutes of cardiopulmonary resuscitation properly performed in conjunction with rewarming techniques as described in the current State of Alaska Hypothermia and Cold Water Near-Drowning Guidelines published by the division of public health, Department of Health and Social Services; or

at least 30 minutes of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and advanced cardiac life support techniques properly performed by a person authorized to perform advanced life support services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 53 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “licensed under this chapter, a” following “intensive care paramedic” and made related and stylistic changes; in (a)(1) and (a)(3) inserted “mobile intensive care” preceding “paramedic”.

Sec. 18.08.090.
[Renumbered as AS 18.08.200.]

Sec. 18.08.095.
Air ambulance service.

An air ambulance service provider that provides air ambulance services to an individual covered under an air ambulance membership agreement with the provider may not deny emergency medical services to any person on the basis that the person is not covered under an air ambulance membership agreement. In this section, “air ambulance membership agreement” and “air ambulance service provider” have the meanings given in AS

21.61.110

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.08.200.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“advanced life support” means emergency care techniques provided under the written or oral orders of a physician that include manual electric cardiac defibrillation, administration of antiarrhythmic agents, intravenous therapy, intramuscular therapy, or use of endotracheal intubation devices;

“ambulance” means any publicly or privately owned means of conveyance intended to be used and maintained or operated for the transportation of persons who are sick, injured, wounded, or otherwise helpless;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“consumer of emergency medical services” means a person who is not a provider of emergency medical services as defined in this section;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“emergency medical care” means the services utilized in responding to the perceived individual needs for immediate medical care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury;

“emergency medical dispatcher” means a trained public safety telecommunicator with additional training and specific emergency medical knowledge essential for the efficient management of emergency medical communications;

“emergency medical service” means the provision of emergency medical care and transportation of the sick and injured;

“emergency medical services system” means a system that provides for the arrangement of personnel, facilities, and equipment for the effective and coordinated delivery of health care services, including trauma care, under emergency conditions, occurring either as a result of the patient’s condition or of natural disasters or similar situations, and that is administered by a statewide network that has the authority and resources to provide effective administration of the system;

“emergency medical technician” means a person trained in emergency medical care and certified in accordance with the regulations prescribed under AS

18.08.080

;

“mobile intensive care paramedic” means an individual licensed by the department who has completed a paramedic training program approved by the department and is authorized by law to provide advanced life support under the direct or indirect supervision of a physician;

“paramedic training program” means a training program prescribed in regulations of the department that includes classroom, clinical, and field internship components designed to provide an individual with the knowledge and skills necessary to function as a mobile intensive care paramedic;

“provider of emergency medical services” means a person whose occupation or profession is, or has been, the delivery or administration of emergency medical services; a person who has a fiduciary position with, or has a fiduciary interest in, a health activity, facility or other health agency, or a legal or financial interest in the rendering of any component of emergency medical services; and

“trauma care” includes injury prevention, triage, prehospital care, hospital care, and rehabilitative services for major single system or multisystem injuries that require immediate medical or surgical intervention or treatment to prevent death or permanent disability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1978; am § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am §§ 20, 21, 27 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 32 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

18.08.090

; renumbered in 2002. Reorganized in 1986, 1994, and 2021 to alphabetize the defined terms. In 1994, “and” was inserted after the first semicolon in paragraph (13) to correct a manifest error of omission in § 1, ch. 100, SLA 1977.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, added (14) [now (11)].